Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

19-2.5-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that the intent of this article 2.5 is to protect, restore, and improve the public safety by creating a system of juvenile justice that will appropriately sanction juveniles who violate the law and, in certain cases, will also
provide the opportunity to bring together affected victims, the community, and juvenile offenders for restorative purposes.

The general assembly further finds that, while holding paramount the public safety, the juvenile justice system must take into consideration the best interests of the juvenile, the victim, and the community in providing appropriate treatment to reduce
the rate of recidivism in the juvenile justice system and to assist the juvenile in becoming a productive member of society.

The general assembly finds that the public has the right to safe and secure homes and communities and that when a delinquent act occurs, safety and security is compromised; and the result is harm to the victim, the community, and the juvenile offender.
The general assembly finds that the juvenile justice system should seek to repair such harm and that victims and communities should be provided with the opportunity to elect to participate actively in a restorative process that
would hold the juvenile offender accountable for the offense.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 557, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-102 (1) and (2) as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-102. Definitions.

In addition to the terms defined in section 19-1-103, as used in this article 2.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjudication" means a determination by the court that it has been proven beyond a reasonable doubt to the trier of fact that a juvenile has committed a delinquent act or that a juvenile has pled guilty to committing a delinquent act. In addition, when
a previous conviction must be pled and proven as an element of an offense or for purposes of sentence enhancement, "adjudication" means conviction.

"Adjudicatory trial" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Adult" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Basic identification information" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Behavioral health" has the same meaning as set forth in section 27-60-100.3.

"Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

"Commit" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Competent to proceed" means that a juvenile has sufficient present ability to consult with the juvenile's attorney with a reasonable degree of rational understanding in order to assist in the defense and that the juvenile has a rational as well as a
factual understanding of the proceedings.

"Cost of care" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"County department" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Crossover youth plan" means the portion of the annual plan described in section 19-2.5-302 and devised in each judicial district by the juvenile services planning committee that outlines identification and notification of dually identified crossover
youth as described in section 19-2.5-302.

"Delinquent act" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Detention" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Determinate period" means that the department of human services may not transfer legal or physical custody of a juvenile until the juvenile has completed the period of commitment imposed by the court, unless otherwise ordered by the court; except that
the department of human services may release the juvenile on parole prior to completion of the determinate period, pursuant to section 19-2.5-1203.

"Diagnostic and evaluation center" means a facility for the examination and study of persons committed to the custody of the department of human services.

"Director" means the executive director of the department of public safety.

"Diversion" means a decision made by a person with authority or a delegate of that person that results in specific official action of the legal system not being taken in regard to a specific juvenile or child and in lieu thereof providing or referring
the juvenile or child to an individually designed program or activity, if necessary, provided by district attorneys' offices, governmental units, or nongovernmental units. The goal of diversion is to prevent further involvement
of the juvenile or child in the formal legal system.

Diversion of a juvenile or child may take place either at the prefiling level as an alternative to the filing of a petition pursuant to section 19-2.5-502 or postfiling as an alternative to adjudication. Services may include restorative justice practices
as defined in subsection (45) of this section.

"Division of youth services" or "division" means the division of youth services, created in section 19-2.5-1501.

"Dually identified crossover youth" means youth who are currently involved in the juvenile justice system and the child welfare system or have a history in the child welfare system that includes, but is not limited to, a family assessment response service
plan or an open case.

Repealed.

"Gang", as used in sections 19-2.5-305 and 19-2.5-1504, means a group of three or more individuals with a common interest, bond, or activity characterized by criminal or delinquent conduct, engaged in either collectively or individually.

"Governmental unit", as used in sections 19-2.5-402, 19-2.5-1502, and 19-2.5-1519, means any county, city and county, city, town, judicial district attorney's office, or school district.

"Guardian ad litem" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Halfway house" means a group care facility for juveniles who have been placed on probation or parole pursuant to the terms of this article 2.5.

"Incompetent to proceed" means that, based on an intellectual or developmental disability, mental health disorder, or lack of mental capacity, a juvenile does not have sufficient present ability to consult with the juvenile's attorney with a reasonable
degree of rational understanding in order to assist in the defense or that the juvenile does not have a rational as well as a factual understanding of the proceedings taking place.

"Indian child" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Intellectual and developmental disability" means a disability that is manifested before the person reaches his or her twenty-second birthday, that constitutes a substantial disability to the affected individual, and that is attributable to an intellectual
disability or other neurological conditions when those conditions result in impairment of general intellectual functioning or adaptive behavior similar to that of a person with an intellectual disability. Unless otherwise specifically
stated, the federal definition of "developmental disability", 42 U.S.C. sec. 15002 (8), does not apply.

"Juvenile" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Juvenile community review board" means any board appointed by a board of county commissioners for the purpose of reviewing community placements pursuant to this article 2.5. A juvenile community review board, if practicable, includes but is not limited
to a representative from a county department of human or social services, a local school district, a local law enforcement agency, a local probation department, a local bar association, the division of youth services, and private
citizens.

"Juvenile court" or "court" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Juvenile delinquent" means a juvenile who has been found guilty of a delinquent act.

"Mental capacity" means a juvenile's capacity to meet all of the following criteria:

Appreciate the charges or allegations against the juvenile;

Appreciate the nature of the adversarial process, which includes having a factual and rational understanding of the participants in the proceeding and their roles, including the judge, defense counsel, prosecutor, and, if applicable, the guardian ad litem
and the jury;

Appreciate the range and nature of allowable dispositions that may be imposed by the court;

Have the ability to communicate to counsel information known to the juvenile regarding the allegations against the juvenile, as well as information relevant to the proceeding at issue; and

Understand and appreciate the right to testify and to voluntarily exercise the right.

"Mental health disorder" means a substantial disorder of thought, mood, perception, or cognitive ability that results in marked functional disability and significantly interferes with adaptive behavior. "Mental health disorder" does not include acute
intoxication from alcohol or other substances, any condition manifested only by antisocial behavior, or any substance abuse impairment resulting from recent use or withdrawal. However, substance abuse that results in a long-term,
substantial disorder of thought, mood, or cognitive ability may constitute a mental health disorder.

"Mental health hospital placement prescreening" means a face-to-face mental health examination conducted by a mental health professional to determine whether a child should be placed in a facility for evaluation pursuant to section 27-65-106. The prescreening
may include consultation with other mental health professionals and review of all available records on the child.

"Office of alternate defense counsel" means the office of alternate defense counsel created and existing pursuant to section 21-2-101.

"Office of the state public defender" means the office of state public defender created and existing pursuant to section 21-1-101.

"Parent" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Peace officer" has the same meaning as set forth in section 16-2.5-101.

"Physical custodian", as used in sections 19-2.5-203 and 19-2.5-501, means a guardian, whether or not appointed by court order, with whom the juvenile has resided.

"Reasonable efforts" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Receiving center" means a facility used by the department of human services to provide temporary detention and care for juveniles pending placement in a training school, camp, or other facility.

"Repeat juvenile offender" is described in section 19-2.5-1125 (2).

"Residential community placement" means any placement for residential purposes permitted pursuant to this title 19, except in an institutional facility directly operated by, or a secure facility under contract with, the department of human services and
except while a juvenile is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile parole board.

"Restoration to competency hearing" means a hearing to determine whether a juvenile who has previously been determined to be incompetent to proceed has achieved or is restored to competency.

"Restorative justice" means those practices that emphasize repairing the harm to the victim and community caused by delinquent acts. Restorative justice practices may include victim-offender conferences attended voluntarily by the victim, a victim advocate,
the offender, community members, and supporters of the victim or the offender that provide an opportunity for the offender to accept responsibility for the harm caused to those affected by the crime and to participate in
setting consequences to repair the harm. Consequences recommended by the participants may include but need not be limited to apologies, community service, restoration, and counseling. The selected consequences are incorporated
into an agreement that sets time limits for completion of the consequences and is signed by all participants.

Any statements made during the restorative justice process are confidential and must not be used against the juvenile, or as a basis for charging or prosecuting the juvenile, unless the juvenile commits a chargeable offense during the process.

Nothing precludes a person from reporting child abuse or neglect when required pursuant to section 19-3-304 or a mental health provider from complying with a duty to warn pursuant to section 13-21-117 (2).

"Screening team" means the person or persons designated, pursuant to rule 3.7 of the Colorado rules of juvenile procedure, by the chief judge in each judicial district or, for the second judicial district, the presiding judge of the Denver juvenile court
to make recommendations to the juvenile court concerning whether a juvenile taken into temporary custody should be released or admitted to a detention or shelter facility pursuant to section 19-2.5-305.

"Sentencing hearing" means a hearing to determine what sentence must be imposed on a juvenile delinquent or what other order of disposition must be made concerning a juvenile delinquent, including commitment. A sentencing hearing may be part of the proceeding
that includes the adjudicatory trial, or it may be held at a time subsequent to the adjudicatory trial.

"Staff secure facility" means a group facility or home at which each juvenile is continuously under staff supervision and at which all services, including education and treatment, are provided on site. A staff secure facility may or may not be a locked
facility.

"Standardized mental health disorder screening" means the mental health disorder screening conducted using the juvenile standardized screening instruments and the procedures adopted pursuant to section 16-11.9-102.

"Status offense" has the same meaning as defined in federal law in 28 CFR 31.304, as amended.

"Temporary holding facility" is defined in section 19-1-103.

"Training school" means an institution providing care, education, treatment, and rehabilitation for juveniles in a closed setting and includes a regional center established in part 3 of article 10.5 of title 27.

"Victim", as used in this article 2.5, means any party immediately and directly aggrieved by the juvenile or youth; that party's spouse; the party's parent, sibling, or child who is living with the party; a victim compensation board that has paid a victim
compensation claim; a person or entity that has suffered losses because of a contractual relationship with such party, including an insurer or because of liability under section 14-6-110; or, in the absence of any of the above,
the state.

"Youth" is defined in section 19-1-103.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 558, § 2, effective October 1; (20) repealed, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3118, § 29, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(34) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3229, § 29, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-103 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

19-2.5-103. Jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction in proceedings:

Concerning any juvenile ten years of age or older who has violated:

Any federal or state law, except nonfelony state traffic, game and fish, and parks and recreation laws or rules; the offense specified in section 18-13-122, concerning the illegal possession or consumption of ethyl alcohol or marijuana by an underage
person or illegal possession of marijuana paraphernalia by an underage person; the offenses specified in section 18-18-406 (5)(b)(I) and (5)(b)(II), concerning marijuana and marijuana concentrate; and the civil
infraction in section 18-7-109 (3), concerning exchange of a private image by a juvenile;

Any county or municipal ordinance except traffic ordinances, the penalty for which may be a jail sentence of more than ten days; or

Any lawful order of the court made pursuant to this title 19;

Concerning a juvenile to whom section 19-2.5-802 applies; except that, after filing charges in the juvenile court but prior to the time that the juvenile court conducts a transfer hearing, the district attorney may file the same or different charges against
the juvenile by direct filing of an information in the district court or by indictment pursuant to section 19-2.5-801. Upon such filing or indictment in the district court, the juvenile court no longer has jurisdiction
over proceedings concerning such charges.

The juvenile court has limited jurisdiction in matters to which section 19-2.5-801 applies.

The fact that a juvenile has been prosecuted or convicted in the county court for a nonfelony violation pursuant to title 42 is not a bar to a subsequent or parallel proceeding pursuant to this title 19 for delinquent acts arising out of the same criminal
episode; nor are proceedings pursuant to this title 19 a bar to a subsequent or parallel prosecution in the county court for a nonfelony violation pursuant to title 42 for the same delinquent acts arising from the same criminal
episode.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the juvenile court may exercise jurisdiction over a juvenile who is under sixteen years of age and who has violated a traffic law or ordinance if the juvenile's case is transferred to
the juvenile court from the county court. Such a transfer is subject to approval by the juvenile court.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the juvenile court and the county court have concurrent jurisdiction over a juvenile who is under eighteen years of age and who is charged with a violation of section 18-13-122, 18-18-406
(5)(b)(I) and (5)(b)(II), 18-18-428, 18-18-429, 18-18-430, or 42-4-1301; except that, if the juvenile court accepts jurisdiction over such a juvenile, the county court jurisdiction terminates.

The juvenile court may retain jurisdiction over a juvenile until all orders have been fully complied with by such person, or any pending cases have been completed, or the statute of limitations applicable to any offense that may be charged has run, regardless
of whether such person has attained the age of eighteen years, and regardless of the age of such person.

This section does not confer any jurisdiction upon the court over a person for any offense committed after the person attains the age of eighteen years.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, the juvenile court may exercise jurisdiction over a juvenile to determine the legal custody of a juvenile or to appoint a guardian of the person or legal custodian of any child who comes
within the juvenile court's jurisdiction pursuant to section 19-1-104.

If a juvenile is charged with a civil infraction and is not charged with an additional offense that would constitute a criminal offense if charged against an adult, the county court has jurisdiction over the civil infraction.

Source:

L. 2021:
(1)(a)(I) and (5) amended, (HB 21-1090), ch. 157, p. 901, § 5, effective May 20; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 564, § 2, effective October 1; (9) added, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3220, §
388, effective March 1, 2022.

19-2.5-104. Venue.

Proceedings in cases brought pursuant to this article 2.5 must be commenced in the county in which the alleged violation of the law, ordinance, or court order took place; except that the court may order a change of venue based upon written findings that
a change of venue is necessary to ensure that the juvenile receives a fair trial, in which case venue must be transferred to an appropriate jurisdiction prior to the findings of fact. When the court in which the petition
was filed is in a county other than where the juvenile resides, such court may transfer venue to the court of the county of the juvenile's residence for the purposes of supervision after sentencing and entry of any order
for payment of restitution. A transfer of venue may not be rejected for any reason except where venue would be improper.

For purposes of determining proper venue, a juvenile who is placed in the legal custody of a county department of human or social services is deemed for the entire period of placement to reside in the county in which the juvenile's legal custodian is
located, even if the juvenile is physically residing in a residential facility located in another county. If a juvenile is placed in the legal custody of a county department of human or social services, the court shall
not transfer venue during the period of placement to any county other than the county in which the juvenile's legal custodian is located.

In determining proper venue, section 18-1-202 applies.

A court transferring venue pursuant to this section shall transmit all documents and legal social records, or certified copies of such documents, to the receiving court. The receiving court shall then proceed with the case as if the petition had been
originally filed or the adjudication had been originally made in such court.

Upon transfer of venue, the receiving court shall set a date not more than thirty-five days following the date upon which the change of venue is ordered for the juvenile and the juvenile's parent or guardian to appear.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 565, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-105 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-105. Representation of petitioner.

In all matters pursuant to this article 2.5, the district attorney shall represent the petitioner.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 566, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-106 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-106. Victim's right to attend dispositional, review, and restitution proceedings.

The victim of any delinquent act, or a relative of the victim, if the victim has died, has the right to attend all dispositional, review, and restitution proceedings resulting from the adjudication of such act. The victim or the victim's relative has
the right to appear at the proceedings personally or with counsel and to adequately and reasonably express the victim's views concerning the act, the juvenile, the need for restitution, and the type of dispositional orders that the
court should issue. When issuing such orders, the court shall consider the statements made by the victim, or the victim's relative, and shall make a finding, on the record, when appropriate, as to whether the juvenile would pose a
threat to public safety if granted probation.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 566, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-112 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-107. Parental accountability - legislative intent.

The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of any juvenile subject to proceedings pursuant to this article 2.5 is required to attend all proceedings that may be brought pursuant to this article 2.5 concerning the juvenile. The court may impose contempt
sanctions against the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for failure, without good cause, to attend any proceeding concerning the juvenile; except that, if the juvenile's legal custodian is a county department of human
or social services or the state department of human services, the legal custodian need not attend any proceeding at which the juvenile's guardian ad litem is present.

For any juvenile adjudicated pursuant to this article 2.5, the court may specify its expectations for the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, so long as the parent, guardian, or legal custodian is a party to the delinquency proceedings.

The general assembly determines that families play a significant role in the cause and cure of delinquent behavior of children. It is therefore the intent of the general assembly that parents cooperate and participate significantly in the assessment and
treatment planning for their children.

Any treatment plan developed pursuant to this article 2.5 may include requirements to be imposed on the juvenile's parent, so long as the parent is a party to the delinquency proceedings. These requirements may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Maximum parent involvement in the sentencing orders;

Participation by the parent in parental responsibility training;

Cooperation by the parent in treatment plans for the juvenile;

Performance of public service by the parent;

Cost of care reimbursement by the parent;

Supervision of the juvenile; and

Any other provisions the court deems to be in the best interests of the juvenile, the parent's other children, or the community.

Any parent who is a party to the delinquency proceedings and who fails to comply with any requirements imposed on the parent in a treatment plan may be subject to contempt sanctions.

The court has discretion to exempt the parent from participation in the juvenile's treatment.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 566, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-113 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-108. Effect of proceedings - definition.

An adjudication or proceeding pursuant to this article 2.5 is not equivalent to an adult conviction of a criminal offense and must not impose any civil disability upon a juvenile or disqualify or prejudice the juvenile from holding any position under
the state personnel system or submitting any governmental or military service application or receiving any governmental or military service appointment or from holding public office.

An employer, whether a public entity or private individual or entity, shall not ask an applicant for employment of any age to disclose information related to an arrest, detention, processing, diversion, supervision, adjudication, or court disposition
that occurred while the applicant was subject to the process and jurisdiction of the juvenile court and an applicant of any age is not required to disclose such information in response to any employer inquiry.

Nothing in this section limits public access to information as set forth in section 19-1-304 (1)(b.5) or (5).

The provisions of this subsection (2) do not apply to the screening of applicants who have direct contact with vulnerable persons pursuant to section 27-90-111 or the screening of applicants required by licensed child care centers pursuant to section
26-6-905 or 26.5-5-309.

The provisions of this subsection (2) do not apply to any law enforcement agency of the state or to any political subdivision.

As used in this subsection (2), a "condition of employment" means hiring, promotion, termination, participating in an apprenticeship training program, or a training program that leads to employment.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 567, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
Entire section amended, (HB 22-1383), ch. 365, p. 2604, § 3, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-111 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1383, see section 1 of chapter 365, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-2.5-109. Saving clause.

The repeal of article 2 of this title 19 and the enactment of this article 2.5, effective October 1, 2021, do not affect the validity of any actions or proceedings initiated or in existence prior to such effective date and brought pursuant to the legislative
provisions in place prior to such effective date.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 567, § 2, effective October 1; entire section amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2800, § 15, effective October 1.

19-2.5-110. Outstanding balances owed by juveniles - report - repeal.

On and after October 1, 2021, the balance of any court-assessed or court-ordered costs imposed pursuant to section 19-2.5-605 (2)(b), 19-2.5-1101 (4), 19-2.5-1103 (1)(l) or (6), 19-2.5-1108 (2)(a)(VIII) or (2)(a)(IX), 19-2.5-1119 (1), or 19-2.5-1120,
other than payments required pursuant to Title IV of the federal "Social Security Act", against a juvenile, the parent or guardian of a juvenile, or other person who is liable for the support of a juvenile who was adjudged a ward
of the juvenile court are unenforceable and not collectable.

Within six months after the effective date of section 19-2-115, as enacted by House Bill 21-1315, the court shall vacate the portion of a court order imposing the costs described in subsection (1) of this section.

If the judicial department has referred the outstanding balance of the costs to a private collection agency for collection, the department shall inform the agency that the balance has been vacated and the balance is not collectable.

On or before July 1, 2022, the state court administrator shall report to the house of representatives judiciary committee and the senate judiciary committee, or their successor committees, the number of orders vacated or partially vacated pursuant to
this section, or section 19-2-115 prior to its repeal in 2021, in each judicial district and the amount of the balances vacated in each judicial district.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2025.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire section added, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3119, § 31, effective October 1.

Cross references:
(1) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

(2) For Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", see 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.